test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_3st_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    suojâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suoijâl
    suomâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suomâst
    suonjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suonjârd
    suorgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgit
    suorgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgât
    suovâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suovâst
    suptâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suptâd
    sutettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sutteet
    suttâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suttâd
    suábbádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suábbád
    suábástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suábbást
    suáittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáitám
    suájádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suájáád
    suálmudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suálmud
    suálssidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suálssid
    suáládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáláád
    suámudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suámmud
    suárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suárrán
    suávuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suávut
    suáŋustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáŋŋust
    tu]ášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuššááš
    tuhhiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuhhit
    tuhlediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuhled
    tuigestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuigeest
    tulvâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulvâd
    tumediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tummeed
    tuohâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuohâst
    tuoldiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuoldist
    tuoldiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuoldit
    tuoldâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoldâtâm
    tuoldâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuoldât
    tuolmâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuolmâd
    tuolmâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuolmâst
    tuolvâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuolvâd
    tuorâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuorrâs
    tuovŋâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuovŋât
    tuovŋâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuovŋâšt
    tuođâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuođâšt
    turdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turdeed
    turdodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turdod
    turgediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turged
    turkkâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turkkâl
    turrâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turrâg
    tuvkkâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuvkkâl
    tuágádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuággád
    tuáijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájám
    tuájistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuájist
    tuájásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáijás
    tuálppádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálppád
    tuálvistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálvist
    tuámittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuámit
    tuárgistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárgist
    tuáridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárrid
    tuáruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárut
    tuáráskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáráásk
    tuáskistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáskist
    tuávuštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuávuštâm
    tuššâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuššâd
    uccááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uccát
    ucediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ucceed
    ucášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uccááš
    uhkediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uhked
    uinášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uináš
    uládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ulláád
    urbádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: urbád

    uškestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uškeest
    uštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uštâččâm
    vuoigiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoigiim
    vuojâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuojâd
    vuojâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoijâl
    vuojâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuojâst
    vuojâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuojât
    vuolgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuolgâd
    vuolgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuolgât
    vuolâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuolâd
    vuolâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuolâst
    vuordâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuordâš
    vuorâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuorât
    vuossiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuossit
    vuovlâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuovlât
    vuájuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuájut
    vuálániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuállán
    vuámášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuámmáš
    vuárbádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárbád
    vuárhudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárhud
    vuárnuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárnut
    vuátudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáttud
    vuáđudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáđđud
    vuáđustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáđust
    vuáčuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáččut
    vuážáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuážžásk

    čulgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čulgâd
    čummiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čummit
    čuoggiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoggist
    čuojâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuojât
    čuoldâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoldâst
    čuolâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuollâl
    čuolâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuolâst
    čuolâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuolât
    čuomâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuomâst
    čuopâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuopât
    čuormâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuormâst
    čuovrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovrijd
    čuovâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovvân
    čuovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovât
    čuožâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuožžâst
    čuožžiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuožžit
    čurgiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurgist
    čurmâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurmâd
    čuágudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuággud
    šuáhkádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáhkád
    šuáhášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáháš
    čuájustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuájust
    čuájádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuájáád
    šuámbistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuámbist
    čuárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárbud
    čuárbášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárbáš
    čuárgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárgud
    čuárvuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárvut
    čuávdásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávdás
    šuávhudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuávhud
    čuávudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávud
    čuávuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávvul
    čuávuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávut
    šuávuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuávvut
    čuážudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuážžud
    čuážuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuážžut
    App: lookup
    cogâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cooggâd
    foskâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fooskâd
    foskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fooskâst
    vonnâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: voonnâl
    vonâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: voonât
    voskâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vooskâd
    voskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vooskâst
    vovdâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: voovdâd
    vojâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: voojâst
    šovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoovvât
    čovgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoovgâd
    čovgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoovgât
    čovdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoovdâš
    šolâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoollâsm
    čomestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoomeest
    čonâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoonâd
    čonâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoonnâl
    čonâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoonâst
    šolmâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoolmâšt
    čolgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoolgâd
    čolgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoolgât
    šolijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoolijd
    šohâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoohân
    hokâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hookkât
    horcâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoorcâst
    jogâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jooggâld
    jomijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joomijd
    joreštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jooreešt
    josijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joosijd
    jođettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joođeet
    jodottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joddoot
    kobdottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdoot
    kobâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koobbâg
    kohâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koohâst
    kojâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooijât
    kolgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgood
    kolmâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koolmâš
    kolottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooloot
    komettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koomeet
    konâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koonâst
    korhâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorhât
    korottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooroot
    korrâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorrâd
    kortâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koortâst
    korvâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorvâš
    korâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorâd
    korâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koorâsm
    korâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorâš
    koskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooskâst
    kosostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kossoost
    kovlottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kovloot
    kovrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koovrijd
    kovrâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koovrâg
    kovrâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koovrâs
    koškâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooškâd
    kočodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koččood
    kočottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koččoot
    kočâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooččâd
    kočâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koočât
    lobâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loobbâd
    lohđuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loohđut
    lojodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loijood
    lonestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: looneest
    lonottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loonoot
    lopâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: looppât
    losâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loossâl
    lovdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loovdâš
    lovottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lovvoot
    ložâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loožžâd
    lođâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loođâst
    moigârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mooigârd
    moiváskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mooivásk
    molhâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moolhâg
    molârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moolârd
    monâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moonâd
    monâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moonnâl
    monâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moonât
    morettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mooreet
    mortottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: morttoot
    mosijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moosijd
    moskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moskood
    moskottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moskoot
    movtijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moovtijd
    nomâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noomât
    nođhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noođhâst
    okâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ookkât
    olgoštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: olgoošt
    omâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oomâst
    omâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oomâš
    ooviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovit
    opsijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oopsijd
    opâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooppâd
    opâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooppât
    orodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oorood
    orostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooroost
    oskottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oskoot
    ovdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovded
    ovdištiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovdišt
    oškâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ooškâst
    poggâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pooggâg
    pogâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pooggâst
    polâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poolât
    ponjeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poonjeeld
    porfâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poorfâg
    porgottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porgoot
    porgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poorgât
    poršottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poršoot
    posoliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: possool
    posâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poosâst
    posâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poosât
    posâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poosâš
    potâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poottâl
    povustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poovvust
    povčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poovčâg
    povčâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poovčâst
    pođgottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pođgoot
    počâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pooččâš
    pođâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poođâš
    rohâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roohâl
    rohâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roohâst
    romnjâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roomnjâg
    romnjâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roomnjâs
    rovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roovvât
    rođeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roođeeld
    ročâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rooččâl
    sodâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooddâst
    sogâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooggâd
    soicettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooicet
    soinâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooinâd
    sojâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soojâš
    solâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soolâst
    somijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soomijd
    sorjottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sorjoot
    sovášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovááš
    sovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovât
    sovčádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovčád
    soŋottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooŋoot
    tohâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toohâl
    toimâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tooimât
    tojâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tooijâl
    tomâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toommâl
    torijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toorijd
    tovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toovvât
    čođoliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čođđool
    čođâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoođât
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    jorgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorgeet
    kobdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdeed
    kobdášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdááš
    koccááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koccát
    kodettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koddeet
    kohádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kohháád
    koijâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koijâd
    kolkkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolkkit
    kolmuustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolmust
    kolmuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolmut
    komerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kommeerd
    komániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kommáán
    komášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kommááš
    kordálgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kordáálg
    korrâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: korrâd
    koskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koskâst
    kostâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kostâd
    kosádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kossáád
    kovediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kovveed
    kovládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kovláád
    koškáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koškáát
    koškášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koškááš
    koŋruistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koŋruist

    loppiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loppit
    lozzâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lozzân
    lozzâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ložžân
    ložžiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ložžist
    mogerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moggeerd
    morhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: morheed
    morániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: morráán
    movstáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: movtáskâm
    nohádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nohháád
    nolládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nolláád
    noskettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noskeet
    noskáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noskáát
